Ohio, session 136, HB533.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Ohio: Section 1. That sections 2903.06 and 2903.08 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 2903.06. (A) No person, while operating or participating in the operation of a motor vehicle, motorcycle, under-speed vehicle, motorized bicycle or moped, motor-driven cycle or motor scooter, all-purpose vehicle, utility vehicle, mini-truck, snowmobile, locomotive, watercraft, or aircraft, shall cause the death of another or the unlawful termination of another's pregnancy in any of the following ways: (1) As the proximate result of committing an OVI offense. (2) In one of the following ways: (a) Recklessly; (b) As the proximate result of committing, while operating or participating in the operation of a motor vehicle, under-speed vehicle, motorized bicycle or moped, motor-driven cycle or motor scooter, all-purpose vehicle, utility vehicle, mini-truck, or motorcycle in a construction zone, a reckless operation offense, provided that this division applies only if the person whose death is caused or whose pregnancy is unlawfully terminated is in the construction zone at the time of the offender's commission of the reckless operation offense in the construction zone and does not apply as described in division (F) of this section. (3) In one of the following ways: (a) Negligently; (b) As the proximate result of committing, while operating or participating in the operation of a motor vehicle, under-speed vehicle, motorized bicycle or moped, motor-driven cycle or motor scooter, all-purpose vehicle, utility vehicle, mini-truck, or motorcycle in a construction zone, a speeding offense, provided that this division applies only if the person whose death is caused or whose pregnancy is unlawfully terminated is in the construction zone at the time of the offender's commission of the speeding offense in the construction zone and does not apply as described in division (F) of this section. (4) As the proximate result of committing a violation of any provision of any section contained in Title XLV of the Revised Code that is a minor misdemeanor or of a municipal ordinance that, regardless of the penalty set by ordinance for the violation, is substantially equivalent to any provision of any section contained in Title XLV of the Revised Code that is a minor misdemeanor. (B)(1) Whoever violates division (A)(1) or (2) of this section is guilty of aggravated vehicular homicide and shall be punished as provided in divisions (B)(2) and (3) of this section. (2)(a) Except as otherwise provided in division (B)(2)(b), (c), or (d) of this section, aggravated vehicular homicide committed in violation of division (A)(1) of this section is a felony of the second degree and the court shall impose a mandatory prison term on the offender as described in division (E) of this section. (b) Except as otherwise provided in division (B)(2)(c) or (d) of this section, aggravated vehicular homicide committed in violation of division (A)(1) of this section is a felony of the first degree, and the court shall impose a mandatory prison term on the offender as described in division (E) of this section, if any of the following apply: (i) At the time of the offense, the offender was driving under a suspension or cancellation imposed under Chapter 4510. or any other provision of the Revised Code or was operating a motor vehicle or motorcycle, did not have a valid driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege, and was not eligible for renewal of the offender's driver's license or commercial driver's license without examination under section 4507.10 of the Revised Code. (ii) The offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one prior OVI offense within the previous twenty years. (iii) The offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one prior traffic-related homicide, manslaughter, or assault offense within the previous twenty years. (c) Except as otherwise provided in division (B)(2)(d) of this section, aggravated vehicular homicide committed in violation of division (A)(1) of this section is a felony of the first degree, and the court shall sentence the offender to a mandatory prison term as provided in section 2929.142 of the Revised Code and described in division (E) of this section if any of the following apply: (i) The offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to two prior OVI offenses within the previous twenty years. (ii) The offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to two prior traffic-related homicide, manslaughter, or assault offenses within the previous twenty years. (iii) The offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to two prior violations of any combination of the offenses listed in division (B)(2)(c)(i) and (ii) of this section within the previous twenty years. (d) Aggravated vehicular homicide committed in violation of division (A)(1) of this section is a felony of the first degree, and the court shall sentence the offender to a mandatory prison term as provided in section 2929.142 of the Revised Code and described in division (E) of this section if any of the following apply: (i) The offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to three or more prior OVI offenses within the previous twenty years. (ii) The offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to three or more prior traffic-related homicide, manslaughter, or assault offenses within the previous twenty years. (iii) The offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to three or more prior violations of any combination of the offenses listed in divisions (B)(2)(d)(i) and (ii) of this section within the previous twenty years. (e) In addition to any other sanctions imposed pursuant to division (B)(2)(a), (b), (c), or (d) of this section for aggravated vehicular homicide committed in violation of division (A)(1) of this section, the court shall impose upon the offender a class one suspension of the offender's driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege as specified in division (A)(1) of section 4510.02 of the Revised Code. Divisions (A)(1) to (3) of section 4510.54 of the Revised Code apply to a suspension imposed under division (B)(2)(e) of this section. (f) Notwithstanding section 2929.18 of the Revised Code, and in addition to any other sanctions imposed pursuant to division (B)(2) of this section for aggravated vehicular homicide committed in violation of division (A)(1) of this section, the court shall impose upon the offender a fine of not more than twenty-five thousand dollars. (3) Except as otherwise provided in this division, aggravated vehicular homicide committed in violation of division (A)(2) of this section is a felony of the third degree. Aggravated vehicular homicide committed in violation of division (A)(2) of this section is a felony of the second degree if, at the time of the offense, the offender was driving under a suspension or cancellation imposed under Chapter 4510. or any other provision of the Revised Code or was operating a motor vehicle or motorcycle, did not have a valid driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege, and was not eligible for renewal of the offender's driver's license or commercial driver's license without examination under section 4507.10 of the Revised Code or if the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of this section or any traffic-related homicide, manslaughter, or assault offense. The court shall impose a mandatory prison term on the offender when required by division (E) of this section. In addition to any other sanctions imposed pursuant to this division for a violation of division (A)(2) of this section, the court shall impose upon the offender a class two suspension of the offender's driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege from the range specified in division (A)(2) of section 4510.02 of the Revised Code or, if the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a traffic-related murder, felonious assault, or attempted murder offense, a class one suspension of the offender's driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege as specified in division (A)(1) of that section. (C) Whoever violates division (A)(3) of this section is guilty of vehicular homicide. Except as otherwise provided in this division, vehicular homicide is a misdemeanor of the first degree. Vehicular homicide committed in violation of division (A)(3) of this section is a felony of the fourth degree if, at the time of the offense, the offender was driving under a suspension or cancellation imposed under Chapter 4510. or any other provision of the Revised Code or was operating a motor vehicle or motorcycle, did not have a valid driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege, and was not eligible for renewal of the offender's driver's license or commercial driver's license without examination under section 4507.10 of the Revised Code or if the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of this section or any traffic-related homicide, manslaughter, or assault offense. The court shall impose a mandatory jail term or a mandatory prison term on the offender when required by division (E) of this section. In addition to any other sanctions imposed pursuant to this division, the court shall impose upon the offender a class four suspension of the offender's driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege from the range specified in division (A)(4) of section 4510.02 of the Revised Code, or, if the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of this section or any traffic-related homicide, manslaughter, or assault offense, a class three suspension of the offender's driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege from the range specified in division (A)(3) of that section, or, if the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a traffic-related murder, felonious assault, or attempted murder offense, a class two suspension of the offender's driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege as specified in division (A)(2) of that section. (D) Whoever violates division (A)(4) of this section is guilty of vehicular manslaughter. Except as otherwise provided in this division, vehicular manslaughter is a misdemeanor of the second degree. Vehicular manslaughter is a misdemeanor of the first degree if, at the time of the offense, the offender was driving under a suspension or cancellation imposed under Chapter 4510. or any other provision of the Revised Code or was operating a motor vehicle or motorcycle, did not have a valid driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege, and was not eligible for renewal of the offender's driver's license or commercial driver's license without examination under section 4507.10 of the Revised Code or if the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of this section or any traffic-related homicide, manslaughter, or assault offense. In addition to any other sanctions imposed pursuant to this division, the court shall impose upon the offender a class six suspension of the offender's driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege from the range specified in division (A)(6) of section 4510.02 of the Revised Code or, if the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of this section, any traffic-related homicide, manslaughter, or assault offense, or a traffic-related murder, felonious assault, or attempted murder offense, a class four suspension of the offender's driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege from the range specified in division (A)(4) of that section. (E)(1) The court shall impose a mandatory prison term on an offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of division (A)(1) of this section. Except as otherwise provided in this division, the mandatory prison term shall be a definite term from the range of prison terms provided in division (A)(1)(b) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code for a felony of the first degree or from division (A)(2)(b) of that section for a felony of the second degree, whichever is applicable, except that if the violation is committed on or after March 22, 2019, the court shall impose as the minimum prison term for the offense a mandatory prison term that is one of the minimum terms prescribed for a felony of the first degree in division (A)(1)(a) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code or one of the terms prescribed for a felony of the second degree in division (A)(2)(a) of that section, whichever is applicable. If division (B)(2)(c) or (d) of this section applies to an offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty to the violation of division (A)(1) of this section, the court shall impose the mandatory prison term pursuant to division (A) or (B) of section 2929.142 of the Revised Code, as applicable. The court shall impose a mandatory jail term of at least fifteen days on an offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a misdemeanor violation of division (A)(3)(b) of this section and may impose upon the offender a longer jail term as authorized pursuant to section 2929.24 of the Revised Code. (2) The court shall impose a mandatory prison term on an offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of division (A)(2) or (3)(a) of this section or a felony violation of division (A)(3)(b) of this section if either division (E)(2)(a) or (b) of this section applies. The mandatory prison term shall be a definite term from the range of prison terms provided in division (A)(3)(a) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code for a felony of the third degree or from division (A)(4) of that section for a felony of the fourth degree, whichever is applicable. The court shall impose a mandatory prison term on an offender in a category described in this division if either of the following applies: (a) The offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of this section or section 2903.08 of the Revised Code. (b) At the time of the offense, the offender was driving under suspension or cancellation under Chapter 4510. or any other provision of the Revised Code or was operating a motor vehicle or motorcycle, did not have a valid driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege, and was not eligible for renewal of the offender's driver's license or commercial driver's license without examination under section 4507.10 of the Revised Code. (F) Divisions (A)(2)(b) and (3)(b) of this section do not apply in a particular construction zone unless signs of the type described in section 2903.081 of the Revised Code are erected in that construction zone in accordance with the guidelines and design specifications established by the director of transportation under section 5501.27 of the Revised Code. The failure to erect signs of the type described in section 2903.081 of the Revised Code in a particular construction zone in accordance with those guidelines and design specifications does not limit or affect the application of division (A)(1), (A)(2)(a), (A)(3)(a), or (A)(4) of this section in that construction zone or the prosecution of any person who violates any of those divisions in that construction zone. (G)(1) As used in this section: (a) "Mandatory prison term" and "mandatory jail term" have the same meanings as in section 2929.01 of the Revised Code. (b) "Traffic-related homicide, manslaughter, or assault offense" means a violation of section 2903.04 of the Revised Code in circumstances in which division (D) of that section applies, a violation of section 2903.06 or 2903.08 of the Revised Code, or a violation of section 2903.06, 2903.07, or 2903.08 of the Revised Code as they existed prior to March 23, 2000. (c) "Construction zone" has the same meaning as in section 5501.27 of the Revised Code. (d) "Reckless operation offense" means a violation of section 4511.20 of the Revised Code or a municipal ordinance substantially equivalent to section 4511.20 of the Revised Code. (e) "Speeding offense" means a violation of section 4511.21 of the Revised Code or a municipal ordinance pertaining to speed. (f) "Traffic-related murder, felonious assault, or attempted murder offense" means a violation of section 2903.01 or 2903.02 of the Revised Code in circumstances in which the offender used a motor vehicle as the means to commit the violation, a violation of division (A)(2) of section 2903.11 of the Revised Code in circumstances in which the deadly weapon used in the commission of the violation is a motor vehicle, or an attempt to commit aggravated murder or murder in violation of section 2923.02 of the Revised Code in circumstances in which the offender used a motor vehicle as the means to attempt to commit the aggravated murder or murder. (g) "Motor vehicle," "mini-truck," "under-speed vehicle," "motorized bicycle or moped," "motor-driven cycle or motor scooter," and "utility vehicle" have the same meanings as in section 4501.01 of the Revised Code. (h) "All-purpose vehicle" has the same meaning as in section 4519.01 of the Revised Code. (i) "OVI offense" means a violation of division (A) of section 4511.19 of the Revised Code, a violation of division (A) of section 1547.11 of the Revised Code, a violation of division (A)(3) of section 4561.15 of the Revised Code, or a substantially equivalent municipal ordinance. (2) For the purposes of this section, when a penalty or suspension is enhanced because of a prior or current violation of a specified law or a prior or current specified offense, the reference to the violation of the specified law or the specified offense includes any violation of any substantially equivalent municipal ordinance, former law of this state, or current or former law of another state or the United States. Sec. 2903.08. (A) No person, while operating or participating in the operation of a motor vehicle, motorcycle, under-speed vehicle, motorized bicycle or moped, motor-driven cycle or motor scooter, all-purpose vehicle, utility vehicle, mini-truck, snowmobile, locomotive, watercraft, or aircraft, shall cause serious physical harm to another person or another's unborn in any of the following ways: (1)(a) As the proximate result of committing a violation of division (A) of section 4511.19 of the Revised Code or of a substantially equivalent municipal ordinance; (b) As the proximate result of committing a violation of division (A) of section 1547.11 of the Revised Code or of a substantially equivalent municipal ordinance; (c) As the proximate result of committing a violation of division (A)(3) of section 4561.15 of the Revised Code or of a substantially equivalent municipal ordinance. (2) In one of the following ways: (a) As the proximate result of committing, while operating or participating in the operation of a motor vehicle, under-speed vehicle, motorized bicycle or moped, motor-driven cycle or motor scooter, all-purpose vehicle, utility vehicle, mini-truck, or motorcycle in a construction zone, a reckless operation offense, provided that this division applies only if the person to whom the serious physical harm is caused or to whose unborn the serious physical harm is caused is in the construction zone at the time of the offender's commission of the reckless operation offense in the construction zone and does not apply as described in division (E) of this section; (b) Recklessly. (3) As the proximate result of committing, while operating or participating in the operation of a motor vehicle, under-speed vehicle, motorized bicycle or moped, motor-driven cycle or motor scooter, all-purpose vehicle, utility vehicle, mini-truck, or motorcycle in a construction zone, a speeding offense, provided that this division applies only if the person to whom the serious physical harm is caused or to whose unborn the serious physical harm is caused is in the construction zone at the time of the offender's commission of the speeding offense in the construction zone and does not apply as described in division (E) of this section. (B)(1) Whoever violates division (A)(1) of this section is guilty of aggravated vehicular assault. Except as otherwise provided in this division, aggravated vehicular assault is a felony of the third degree. Aggravated vehicular assault is a felony of the second degree if any of the following apply: (a) At the time of the offense, the offender was driving under a suspension imposed under Chapter 4510. or any other provision of the Revised Code. (b) The offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of this section. (c) The offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any traffic-related homicide, manslaughter, or assault offense. (d) The offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to three or more prior violations of division (A) of section 4511.19 of the Revised Code or a substantially equivalent municipal ordinance within the previous ten years. (e) The offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to three or more prior violations of division (A) of section 1547.11 of the Revised Code or of a substantially equivalent municipal ordinance within the previous ten years. (f) The offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to three or more prior violations of division (A)(3) of section 4561.15 of the Revised Code or of a substantially equivalent municipal ordinance within the previous ten years. (g) The offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to three or more prior violations of any combination of the offenses listed in division (B)(1)(d), (e), or (f) of this section. (h) The offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a second or subsequent felony violation of division (A) of section 4511.19 of the Revised Code. (2) In addition to any other sanctions imposed pursuant to division (B)(1) of this section, except as otherwise provided in this division, the court shall impose upon the offender a class three suspension of the offender's driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege from the range specified in division (A)(3) of section 4510.02 of the Revised Code. If the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of this section, any traffic-related homicide, manslaughter, or assault offense, or any traffic-related murder, felonious assault, or attempted murder offense, the court shall impose either a class two suspension of the offender's driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege from the range specified in division (A)(2) of that section or a class one suspension as specified in division (A)(1) of that section. (C)(1) Whoever violates division (A)(2) or (3) of this section is guilty of vehicular assault and shall be punished as provided in divisions (C)(2) and (3) of this section. (2) Except as otherwise provided in this division, vehicular assault committed in violation of division (A)(2) of this section is a felony of the fourth degree. Vehicular assault committed in violation of division (A)(2) of this section is a felony of the third degree if, at the time of the offense, the offender was driving under a suspension imposed under Chapter 4510. or any other provision of the Revised Code, if the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of this section or any traffic-related homicide, manslaughter, or assault offense, or if, in the same course of conduct that resulted in the violation of division (A)(2) of this section, the offender also violated section 4549.02, 4549.021, or 4549.03 of the Revised Code. In addition to any other sanctions imposed, the court shall impose upon the offender a class four suspension of the offender's driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege from the range specified in division (A)(4) of section 4510.02 of the Revised Code or, if the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of this section, any traffic-related homicide, manslaughter, or assault offense, or any traffic-related murder, felonious assault, or attempted murder offense, a class three suspension of the offender's driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege from the range specified in division (A)(3) of that section. (3) Except as otherwise provided in this division, vehicular assault committed in violation of division (A)(3) of this section is a misdemeanor of the first degree. Vehicular assault committed in violation of division (A)(3) of this section is a felony of the fourth degree if, at the time of the offense, the offender was driving under a suspension imposed under Chapter 4510. or any other provision of the Revised Code or if the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of this section or any traffic-related homicide, manslaughter, or assault offense. In addition to any other sanctions imposed, the court shall impose upon the offender a class four suspension of the offender's driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege from the range specified in division (A)(4) of section 4510.02 of the Revised Code or, if the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of this section, any traffic-related homicide, manslaughter, or assault offense, or any traffic-related murder, felonious assault, or attempted murder offense, a class three suspension of the offender's driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege from the range specified in division (A)(3) of section 4510.02 of the Revised Code. (D)(1) The court shall impose a mandatory prison term, as described in division (D)(4) of this section, on an offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of division (A)(1) of this section. (2) The court shall impose a mandatory prison term, as described in division (D)(4) of this section, on an offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of division (A)(2) of this section or a felony violation of division (A)(3) of this section if either of the following applies: (a) The offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of this section or section 2903.06 of the Revised Code. (b) At the time of the offense, the offender was driving under suspension under Chapter 4510. or any other provision of the Revised Code. (3) The court shall impose a mandatory jail term of at least seven days on an offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a misdemeanor violation of division (A)(3) of this section and may impose upon the offender a longer jail term as authorized pursuant to section 2929.24 of the Revised Code. (4) A mandatory prison term required under division (D)(1) or (2) of this section shall be a definite term from the range of prison terms provided in division (A)(2)(b) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code for a felony of the second degree, from division (A)(3)(a) of that section for a felony of the third degree, or from division (A)(4) of that section for a felony of the fourth degree, whichever is applicable, except that if the violation is a felony of the second degree committed on or after March 22, 2019, the court shall impose as the minimum prison term for the offense a mandatory prison term that is one of the minimum terms prescribed for a felony of the second degree in division (A)(2)(a) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code. (E) Divisions (A)(2)(a) and (3) of this section do not apply in a particular construction zone unless signs of the type described in section 2903.081 of the Revised Code are erected in that construction zone in accordance with the guidelines and design specifications established by the director of transportation under section 5501.27 of the Revised Code. The failure to erect signs of the type described in section 2903.081 of the Revised Code in a particular construction zone in accordance with those guidelines and design specifications does not limit or affect the application of division (A)(1) or (2)(b) of this section in that construction zone or the prosecution of any person who violates either of those divisions in that construction zone. (F) As used in this section: (1) "Mandatory prison term" and "mandatory jail term" have the same meanings as in section 2929.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Traffic-related homicide, manslaughter, or assault offense" and "traffic-related murder, felonious assault, or attempted murder offense" have the same meanings as in section 2903.06 of the Revised Code. (3) "Construction zone" has the same meaning as in section 5501.27 of the Revised Code. (4) "Reckless operation offense" and "speeding offense" have the same meanings as in section 2903.06 of the Revised Code. (5) "Motor vehicle," "mini-truck," "under-speed vehicle," "motorized bicycle or moped," "motor-driven cycle or motor scooter," and "utility vehicle" have the same meanings as in section 4501.01 of the Revised Code. (6) "All-purpose vehicle" has the same meaning as in section 4519.01 of the Revised Code. (G) For the purposes of this section, when a penalty or suspension is enhanced because of a prior or current violation of a specified law or a prior or current specified offense, the reference to the violation of the specified law or the specified offense includes any violation of any substantially equivalent municipal ordinance, former law of this state, or current or former law of another state or the United States. Section 2. That existing sections 2903.06 and 2903.08 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Speaker ___________________ of the House of Representatives. President ___________________ of the Senate. Passed ________________________, 20____ Approved ________________________, 20____ Governor. The section numbering of law of a general and permanent nature is complete and in conformity with the Revised Code. Director, Legislative Service Commission. Filed in the office of the Secretary of State at Columbus, Ohio, on the ____ day of ___________, A. D. 20____. Secretary of State. File No. _________	Effective Date ___________________